Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.140

Confidentiality.

Information contained in the claim files and records of victims, under the provisions of this chapter, shall be deemed confidential and shall not be open to public inspection: PROVIDED, That, except as limited by state or federal statutes or regulations, such information may be provided to public employees in the performance of their official duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That except as otherwise limited by state or federal statutes or regulations a claimant or a representative of a claimant, be it an individual or an organization, may review a claim file or receive specific information therefrom upon the presentation of the signed authorization of the claimant: PROVIDED FURTHER, That physicians treating or examining victims claiming benefits under this chapter or physicians giving medical advice to the department regarding any claim may, at the discretion of the department and as not otherwise limited by state or federal statutes or regulations, inspect the claim files and records of such victims, and other persons may, when rendering assistance to the department at any stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining to the administration of this chapter, inspect the claim files and records of such victims at the discretion of the department and as not otherwise limited by state or federal statutes or regulations.

[ 1997 c 310 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 176 s 6; 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 s 14.]